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DI3RW-01

DTC [P0753/62,P0758/63 | Shift Solenoid A/B Electrical Malfunc-
tion (No. 1/No.2 Solenoid Valve)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

Shifting from 1st to O/D is performed in combination with ON and OFF of the No.1 and No.2 solenoid valves
controlled by Engine and ECT ECU. If an open or short circuit occurs in either of the solenoid valves, the
Engine and ECT ECU controls the remaining normal solenoid valve to allow the vehicle to be operated
smoothly (Fail safe function).

HINT:

Check the No.1 solenoid valve when DTC P0753/62 is output, check the No.2 solenoid valve when DTC
P0758/63 is output.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

The Engine and ECT ECU checks for an open or short circuit
in the No.1 or No.2 solenoid valve circuit when it changes.
The Engine and ECT ECU records DTC P0753/62 or
P0758/63 if condition (a) or (b) is detected once, but it does not
light up O/D OFF indicator light.

After Engine and ECT ECU detects condition (a) or (b) continu-

P0753/62 ously 8times ormorein 1trip, it causes the O/D OFF indicator ¢ OpenorshortinNo.1/No.2 solenoid valve circuit
P0758/63 light lights up until condition (a) or (b) disappears. *No.1/No.2solenoid valve
Afterthat, ifthe Engine and ECT ECU detects condition (a) or *Engineand ECTECU

(b) once, it starts lighting up O/D OFF indicator light again.

(a) Solenoidresistanceis8 Q orless (shortcircuit) whenthe
solenoid is energized.

(b) Solenoidresistanceis 100k  Q ormore (open circuit) when
the solenoid is not energized.

Fail Safe Function:

If either of the shift solenoid valve circuits develops an open or short, the Engine and ECT ECU turns the
other solenoid valve ON and OFF to shift to the gear positions shown in the table below. The Engine and
ECT ECU also turns the SL solenoid valve OFF at the same time. If both solenoids are malfunctioning, hy-
draulic control cannot be performed electronically and must be done manually.

Manual shifting as shown in the following table must be done (In the case of a short circuit, the Engine and
ECT ECU stops sending current to the short circuited solenoid).

NORMAL NO.1 SOLENOID NO.2 SOLENOID BOTH SOLENOIDS MAL-
Range ' MALi.:UNCTIONING MALF'UNCTIONING FUNCTIONING .
Solenoid valve 4 Solenoid valve Solengid valve Gear when shift selector is
No.1Np.2 1 Ng¢.1No.2 i No.1Nb.2 1 manually operated
ON | OFF 1st X ON 3rd ON X 1st O/D
5 ON ON 2nd X ON 3rd OFF X O/D O/D
OFF ON 3rd X ON 3rd OFF X o/D o/D
OFF OFF O/D X QFF 0/D DFF X 0/D 0/D
ON | OFF 1st X ON 3rd ON X 1st 3rd
2 ON ON 2nd X ON 3rd OFF X 3rd 3rd
OFF ON 3rd X ON 3rd OFF X 3rd 3rd
ON OFF 1st X OFF 1st ON X 1st 1st
L ONON 2nd ON 2nd gN K st 1st

X: Malfunctions
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WIRING DIAGRAM
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Measure resistance between terminal S1 or S2 of Engine and ECT ECU and body
ground.

PREPARATION:
(@) Remove the glove compartment door
(See page BO-127).
(b) Disconnect the connector from Engine and ECT ECU.
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminal S1 or S2 of Engine and
ECT ECU and body ground.
OK:
Do1657 Resistance: 11 -15Q at20 °C (68 °F)

(See page IN-35).

0K> Check and replace the Engine and ECT ECU
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2 [ Check harness and connector between Engine and ECT ECU and automatic
transmission solenoid connector.

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the solenoid connector from the automatic trans-
mission.
CHECK:
Checkthe harness and connector betweenterminal S1 or, S2
of Engine and ECT ECU and terminal S1 or S2 of solenoid con-
nector.
OK:
There is no open and no short circuit.

D01666 NG% pair or replace the harness or connector.
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3 Check No.1 or No.2 solenoid valve.

Q08222
Q08224

Q08220

Q08221 D03142

OK

Electrical Check:

PREPARATION:

(@) Jack up the vehicle.

(b) Remove the oil pan.

(c) Disconnect the solenoid connector.

(d) Remove the No.1 or No.2 solenoid valve.

CHECK:
(@) Measure resistance between solenoid connector and
body ground.

(b) Connect positive @ lead to terminal of solenoid connec-
tor, negative © lead to solenoid body.

OK:
(a) Resistance: 11 - 15 Q at 20 °C (68 °F)
(b) The solenoid makes an operating noise.

Mechanical Check:

PREPARATION:

(@) Jack up the vehicle.

(b) Remove the oil pan.

(c) Disconnect the solenoid connector.

(d) Remove the No.1 or No.2 solenoid valve.

CHECK:

(@) Applying 490 kPa (5 kgf/lcm2, 71 psi) of compressed air,
check that the solenoid valves do not leak air.

(b)  When battery positive voltage is supplied to the shift sole-
noid valves, check that the solenoid valves open.

OK:
(a) Solenoid valve does not leak air.
(b) Solenoid valve opens.

o )

Replace the solenoid valve.

Repair or replace the solenoid wire.
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